Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.16
Director of Communications; powers
and duties; investigation; report.

It shall be the duty of
the director to consult each department, office, board, bureau, commission,
or institution in the state for which money is to be appropriated and expended
for communications services, equipment, or facilities, including the executive
and judicial departments, state colleges, university, and state institutions.
The director shall make or cause to be made under his or her supervision an
investigation to determine whether the appropriations are being judiciously
and economically expended for the purposes for which they were made and shall
transmit to the Governor, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and the expending
agency a complete report of each such investigation. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall
be submitted electronically. In making such investigations he
or she shall, at all reasonable times, have access to the offices of all state
departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and institutions and may, for the
purpose of obtaining information as to the operation and communications needs
thereof, examine the books, papers, and public records therein, and the agencies
shall, through their proper officers, furnish such data, information, or statements
as may be requested of them.

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 190.